Connecticut, session 2026, HB05002.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (9) of section 10-262f of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
3 2026):
4 (9) "Foundation" means [(A) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1990,
5 three thousand nine hundred eighteen dollars, (B) for the fiscal year
6 ending June 30, 1991, four thousand one hundred ninety-two dollars,
7 (C) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1992, four thousand four hundred
8 eighty-six dollars, (D) for the fiscal years ending June 30, 1993, June 30,
9 1994, and June 30, 1995, four thousand eight hundred dollars, (E) for the
10 fiscal years ending June 30, 1996, June 30, 1997, and June 30, 1998, five
11 thousand seven hundred eleven dollars, (F) for the fiscal year ending
12 June 30, 1999, five thousand seven hundred seventy-five dollars, (G) for
13 the fiscal years ending June 30, 2000, to June 30, 2007, inclusive, five
14 thousand eight hundred ninety-one dollars, (H) for the fiscal years
15 ending June 30, 2008, to June 30, 2013, inclusive, nine thousand six
16 hundred eighty-seven dollars, and (I)] (A) for the fiscal [year] years
17 ending June 30, 2014, [and each fiscal year thereafter] to June 30, 2026,
18 inclusive, eleven thousand five hundred twenty-five dollars, (B) for the
19 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, eleven thousand five hundred twenty-
LCO 1 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
20 five dollars adjusted by the percentage increase in personal income, as
21 defined in section 2-33a, or the percentage increase in inflation, as
22 defined in section 2-33a, whichever is greater, and (C) for the fiscal year
23 ending June 30, 2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of the
24 foundation for the prior fiscal year adjusted by the percentage increase
25 in personal income, as defined in section 2-33a, or the percentage
26 increase in inflation, as defined in section 2-33a, whichever is greater.
27 Sec. 2. Section 10-252a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
28 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
29 1, 2026):
30 (a) As used in this section, sections 10-65, as amended by this act, 10-
31 252b and 10-264l, as amended by this act:
32 (1) "Choice program" means (A) an interdistrict magnet school
33 program, or (B) a regional agricultural science and technology center.
34 (2) "Foundation" has the same meaning as provided in section 10-
35 262f, as amended by this act.
36 (3) "Resident students" has the same meaning as provided in section
37 10-262f, as amended by this act.
38 (4) "Resident choice program students" means the number of part-
39 time and full-time students of a town enrolled or participating in a
40 particular choice program.
41 (5) "Total need students" has the same meaning as provided in section
42 10-262f, as amended by this act.
43 (6) "Total magnet school program need students" means the sum of
44 (A) the number of part-time and full-time students enrolled in the
45 interdistrict magnet school program of the interdistrict magnet school
46 operator that is (i) not a local or regional board of education, (ii) the
47 board of governors for an independent institution of higher education,
48 as defined in subsection (a) of section 10a-173, or the equivalent of such
49 a board, on behalf of the independent institution of higher education, or
LCO 2 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
50 (iii) any other third-party, not-for-profit corporation approved by the
51 Commissioner of Education, for the school year, and (B) for the school
52 year commencing July 1, 2024, and each school year thereafter, (i) thirty
53 per cent of the number of part-time and full-time students enrolled in
54 such interdistrict magnet school program eligible for free or reduced
55 price meals or free milk, (ii) fifteen per cent of the number of such part-
56 time and full-time students eligible for free or reduced price meals or
57 free milk in excess of the number of such part-time and full-time
58 students eligible for free or reduced price meals or free milk that is equal
59 to sixty per cent of the total number of students enrolled in such
60 interdistrict magnet school program, (iii) twenty-five per cent of the
61 number of part-time and full-time students enrolled in such interdistrict
62 magnet school program who are English language learners, [and] (iv)
63 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, if such
64 interdistrict magnet school program is assisting the state in meeting its
65 obligations pursuant to the decision in Sheff v. O'Neill, 238 Conn. 1
66 (1996), or any related stipulation or order in effect, as determined by the
67 commissioner, for the current fiscal year, thirty per cent of the number
68 of part-time and full-time students enrolled in such interdistrict magnet
69 school program, and (v) (I) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
70 twenty-seven and one-half per cent of the number of part-time and full-
71 time students enrolled in such interdistrict magnet school program, (II)
72 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, twenty-five per cent of the
73 number of part-time and full-time students enrolled in such interdistrict
74 magnet school program, (III) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029,
75 twenty-two and one-half per cent of the number of part-time and full-
76 time students enrolled in such interdistrict magnet school program, and
77 (IV) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
78 thereafter, twenty per cent of the number of part-time and full-time
79 students enrolled in such interdistrict magnet school program.
80 (7) "Sending town" means the town that sends resident choice
81 program students, which it would otherwise be legally responsible for
82 educating, to a choice program.
83 [(8) "Receiving district" has the same meaning as provided in section
LCO 3 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
84 10-266aa.]
85 [(9)] (8) "Weighted funding amount per pupil" means the quotient of
86 (A) the product of the foundation and a town's total need students for
87 the fiscal year prior to the year in which the grant is to be paid, and (B)
88 the number of resident students of the town.
89 [(10)] (9) "In-district student" means a student enrolled or
90 participating in a choice program operated or maintained by a local or
91 regional board of education and for whom such local or regional board
92 of education is legally responsible for educating.
93 [(11)] (10) "Out-of-district student" means a student enrolled or
94 participating in a choice program operated or maintained by a local or
95 regional board of education and who does not reside in the town or a
96 member town of such local or regional board of education.
97 [(12)] (11) "Total revenue per pupil" means the sum of (A) the per
98 student amount of the grant for a choice program student for the fiscal
99 year ending June 30, 2024, (B) the per student amount of any general
100 education tuition for a student in such choice program for the fiscal year
101 ending June 30, 2024, and (C) the per child amount of any tuition
102 charged for a child enrolled in a preschool program offered by a regional
103 educational service center operating an interdistrict magnet school
104 preschool program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, pursuant to
105 section 10-264l, as amended by this act.
106 [(13)] (12) "Adjusted total revenue per pupil" means the sum of (A)
107 the per student amount of the grant for a choice program student for the
108 current fiscal year, (B) the per student amount of any general education
109 tuition for a student in such choice program for the current fiscal year,
110 and (C) the per child amount of any tuition charged for a child enrolled
111 in a preschool program offered by a regional educational service center
112 operating an interdistrict magnet school preschool program for the
113 current fiscal year, pursuant to section 10-264l, as amended by this act.
114 [(14)] (13) "Sending town adjustment factor" means the product of (A)
LCO 4 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
115 the weighted funding amount per pupil or the total revenue per pupil,
116 whichever is greater, for a sending town, and (B) the number of its
117 resident choice program students.
118 (14) "New interdistrict magnet school program operator" means an
119 interdistrict magnet school program operator that commences
120 operations for a new interdistrict magnet school program on or after
121 July 1, 2024.
122 (15) "Comparable per student grant amount" means the per student
123 grant amount received by other interdistrict magnet school program
124 operators authorized to receive a grant under this section that are in the
125 same region, as determined by the Commissioner of Education.
126 (b) (1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in [subdivision (2) of this
127 subsection] subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, for the fiscal [year]
128 years ending June 30, 2025, and [each fiscal year thereafter] June 30,
129 2026, an interdistrict magnet school program operator that is not a local
130 or regional board of education shall be entitled to a grant in an amount
131 equal to the sum of [(A)] (i) forty-two per cent of the difference between
132 [(i)] (I) the product of the foundation and its total magnet school
133 program need students, and [(ii)] (II) the per student amount such
134 operator received under section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for the
135 fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, multiplied by the number of students
136 enrolled in such program for the current fiscal year, and [(B)] (ii) the
137 amount described in subparagraph [(A)(ii)] (A)(i)(II) of this subdivision,
138 except, [if such] for a new interdistrict magnet school program operator,
139 [commences operations on or after July 1, 2024, for a new interdistrict
140 magnet school program,] the per student amount such operator
141 received for purposes of subparagraph [(A)(ii)] (A)(i)(II) of this
142 subdivision [for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, shall equal the per
143 student grant amount received by other interdistrict magnet school
144 program operators authorized to receive a grant under this subdivision
145 in the same region as determined by the Commissioner of Education]
146 shall equal a comparable per student grant amount.
LCO 5 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
147 [(2)] (B) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2025, and [each
148 fiscal year thereafter] June 30, 2026, if [(A)] (i) the quotient of the sum of
149 the total revenue per pupil during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024,
150 and the total number of such students enrolled in such program of such
151 operator during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is greater than [(B)]
152 (ii) the quotient of the sum of the adjusted total revenue per pupil and
153 the number of such students enrolled in such program of such operator
154 during the current fiscal year, then such operator shall be entitled to a
155 grant in an amount equal to the sum of [(i)] (I) the amount described in
156 [subdivision (1) of this subsection] subparagraph (A) of this subdivision,
157 and [(ii)] (II) the product of the difference between the amount described
158 in subparagraph [(A)] (B)(i) of this subdivision and the amount
159 described in subparagraph [(B)] (B)(ii) of this subdivision and the total
160 number of students enrolled in such program of such operator during
161 the current fiscal year.
162 (2) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this
163 subdivision, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, an interdistrict
164 magnet school program operator that is not a local or regional board of
165 education shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of
166 (i) fifty-six per cent of the difference between (I) the product of the
167 foundation and its total magnet school program need students, and (II)
168 the per student amount such operator received under section 10-264l, as
169 amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, multiplied
170 by the number of students enrolled in such program for the current
171 fiscal year, and (ii) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(i)(II) of
172 this subdivision, except for a new interdistrict magnet school program
173 operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per student grant
174 amount.
175 (B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, if (i) the quotient of the
176 sum of the total revenue per pupil during the fiscal year ending June 30,
177 2024, and the total number of such students enrolled in such program of
178 such operator during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is greater than
179 (ii) the quotient of the sum of the adjusted total revenue per pupil and
180 the number of such students enrolled in such program of such operator
LCO 6 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
181 during the current fiscal year, then such operator shall be entitled to a
182 grant in an amount equal to the sum of (I) the amount described in
183 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, and (II) the product of the
184 difference between the amount described in subparagraph (B)(i) of this
185 subdivision and the amount described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this
186 subdivision and the total number of students enrolled in such program
187 of such operator during the current fiscal year.
188 (3) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this
189 subdivision, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, an interdistrict
190 magnet school program operator that is not a local or regional board of
191 education shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of
192 (i) seventy per cent of the difference between (I) the product of the
193 foundation and its total magnet school program need students, and (II)
194 the per student amount such operator received under section 10-264l, as
195 amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, multiplied
196 by the number of students enrolled in such program for the current
197 fiscal year ending, and (ii) the amount described in subparagraph
198 (A)(i)(II) of this subdivision, except for a new interdistrict magnet school
199 program operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per student
200 grant amount.
201 (B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, if (i) the quotient of the
202 sum of the total revenue per pupil during the fiscal year ending June 30,
203 2024, and the total number of such students enrolled in such program of
204 such operator during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is greater than
205 (ii) the quotient of the sum of the adjusted total revenue per pupil and
206 the number of such students enrolled in such program of such operator
207 during the current fiscal year ending, then such operator shall be
208 entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of (I) the amount
209 described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, and (II) the product
210 of the difference between the amount described in subparagraph (B)(i)
211 of this subdivision and the amount described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of
212 this subdivision and the total number of students enrolled in such
213 program of such operator during the current fiscal year.
LCO 7 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
214 (4) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this
215 subdivision, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, an interdistrict
216 magnet school program operator that is not a local or regional board of
217 education shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of
218 (i) eighty-five per cent of the difference between (I) the product of the
219 foundation and its total magnet school program need students, and (II)
220 the per student amount such operator received under section 10-264l, as
221 amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, multiplied
222 by the number of students enrolled in such program for the current
223 fiscal year, and (ii) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(i)(II) of
224 this subdivision, except for a new interdistrict magnet school program
225 operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per student grant
226 amount.
227 (B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, if (i) the quotient of the
228 sum of the total revenue per pupil during the fiscal year ending June 30,
229 2024, and the total number of such students enrolled in such program of
230 such operator during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is greater than
231 (ii) the quotient of the sum of the adjusted total revenue per pupil and
232 the number of such students enrolled in such program of such operator
233 during the current fiscal year, then such operator shall be entitled to a
234 grant in an amount equal to the sum of (I) the amount described in
235 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, and (II) the product of the
236 difference between the amount described in subparagraph (B)(i) of this
237 subdivision and the amount described in subparagraph (B)(ii) of this
238 subdivision and the total number of students enrolled in such program
239 of such operator during the current fiscal year.
240 (5) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this
241 subdivision, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
242 thereafter, an interdistrict magnet school program operator that is not a
243 local or regional board of education shall be entitled to a grant in an
244 amount equal to the product of the foundation and its total magnet
245 school program need students, except for a new interdistrict magnet
246 school program operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per
247 student grant amount.
LCO 8 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
248 (B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
249 thereafter, if (i) the quotient of the sum of the total revenue per pupil
250 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, and the total number of such
251 students enrolled in such program of such operator during the fiscal
252 year ending June 30, 2024, is greater than (ii) the quotient of the sum of
253 the adjusted total revenue per pupil and the number of such students
254 enrolled in such program of such operator during the current fiscal year,
255 then such operator shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the
256 sum of (I) the amount described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision,
257 and (II) the product of the difference between the amount described in
258 subparagraph (B)(i) of this subdivision and the amount described in
259 subparagraph (B)(ii) of this subdivision and the total number of
260 students enrolled in such program of such operator during the current
261 fiscal year.
262 (c) (1) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2025, and [each fiscal
263 year thereafter] June 30, 2026, an interdistrict magnet school operator
264 that is a local or regional board of education shall be entitled to a grant
265 in an amount equal to the sum of [(1)] (A) forty-two per cent of the
266 difference between [(A)] (i) the sum of [(i)] (I) the sending town
267 adjustment factors for each sending town, and [(ii)] (II) the product of
268 the number of in-district students enrolled in the interdistrict magnet
269 school program of such board and the per student amount of the grant
270 under section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for an in-district student
271 enrolled in such interdistrict magnet school program for the fiscal year
272 ending June 30, 2024, and [(B)] (ii) the appropriate per student amounts,
273 for in-district students and out-of-district students, such operator
274 received under section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for the fiscal year
275 ending June 30, 2024, multiplied by the appropriate numbers of in-
276 district students and out-of-district students enrolled in such program
277 for the current fiscal year, and [(2)] (B) the amount described in
278 subparagraph [(B) of subdivision (1) of this subsection] (A)(ii) of this
279 subdivision, except, [if such] for a new interdistrict magnet school
280 program operator, [commences operations on or after July 1, 2024, in a
281 new interdistrict magnet school program,] the per student amount such
LCO 9 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
282 operator received for purposes of subparagraphs (A)(ii) and (B) of this
283 subdivision [for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, shall equal the per
284 student grant amount received by other interdistrict magnet school
285 program operators authorized to receive a grant under this subdivision
286 in the same region as determined by the commissioner.] shall equal a
287 comparable per student grant amount.
288 (2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, an interdistrict magnet
289 school operator that is a local or regional board of education shall be
290 entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of (A) fifty-six per cent
291 of the difference between (i) the sum of (I) the sending town adjustment
292 factors for each sending town, and (II) the product of the number of in-
293 district students enrolled in the interdistrict magnet school program of
294 such board and the per student amount of the grant under section 10-
295 264l, as amended by this act, for an in-district student enrolled in such
296 interdistrict magnet school program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
297 2024, and (ii) the appropriate per student amounts, for in-district
298 students and out-of-district students, such operator received under
299 section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June
300 30, 2024, multiplied by the appropriate numbers of in-district students
301 and out-of-district students enrolled in such program for the current
302 fiscal year, and (B) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this
303 subdivision, except for a new interdistrict magnet school program
304 operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per student grant
305 amount.
306 (3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, an interdistrict magnet
307 school operator that is a local or regional board of education shall be
308 entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of (A) seventy per cent
309 of the difference between (i) the sum of (I) the sending town adjustment
310 factors for each sending town, and (II) the product of the number of in-
311 district students enrolled in the interdistrict magnet school program of
312 such board and the per student amount of the grant under section 10-
313 264l, as amended by this act, for an in-district student enrolled in such
314 interdistrict magnet school program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
315 2024, and (ii) the appropriate per student amounts, for in-district
LCO 10 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
316 students and out-of-district students, such operator received under
317 section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June
318 30, 2024, multiplied by the appropriate numbers of in-district students
319 and out-of-district students enrolled in such program for the current
320 fiscal year, and (B) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this
321 subdivision, except for a new interdistrict magnet school program
322 operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per student grant
323 amount.
324 (4) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, an interdistrict magnet
325 school operator that is a local or regional board of education shall be
326 entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of (A) eighty-five per
327 cent of the difference between (i) the sum of (I) the sending town
328 adjustment factors for each sending town, and (II) the product of the
329 number of in-district students enrolled in the interdistrict magnet school
330 program of such board and the per student amount of the grant under
331 section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for an in-district student
332 enrolled in such interdistrict magnet school program for the fiscal year
333 ending June 30, 2024, and (ii) the appropriate per student amounts, for
334 in-district students and out-of-district students, such operator received
335 under section 10-264l, as amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending
336 June 30, 2024, multiplied by the appropriate numbers of in-district
337 students and out-of-district students enrolled in such program for the
338 current fiscal year, and (B) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(ii)
339 of this subdivision, except for a new interdistrict magnet school
340 program operator, such amount shall equal a comparable per student
341 grant amount.
342 (5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
343 thereafter, an interdistrict magnet school operator that is a local or
344 regional board of education shall be entitled to a grant in an amount
345 equal to the sum of (A) the sending town adjustment factors for each
346 sending town, and (B) the product of the number of in-district students
347 enrolled in the interdistrict magnet school program of such board and
348 the per student amount of the grant under section 10-264l, as amended
349 by this act, for an in-district student enrolled in such interdistrict magnet
LCO 11 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
350 school program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, except for a new
351 interdistrict magnet school program operator, such amount shall equal
352 a comparable per student grant amount.
353 (d) (1) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2025, and [each fiscal
354 year thereafter] June 30, 2026, a local or regional board of education that
355 operates a regional agricultural science and technology center shall be
356 entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the sum of [(1)] (A) forty-two
357 per cent of the difference between [(A)] (i) the sum of [(i)] (I) the sending
358 town adjustment factors for each sending town, and [(ii)] (II) the product
359 of the number of in-district students enrolled in such center and five
360 thousand two hundred, and [(B)] (ii) five thousand two hundred
361 multiplied by the number of students enrolled in such center for the
362 current fiscal year, and [(2)] (B) the amount described in subparagraph
363 [(B) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.] (A)(ii) of this subdivision.
364 (2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, a local or regional board
365 of education that operates a regional agricultural science and
366 technology center shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the
367 sum of (A) fifty-six per cent of the difference between (i) the sum of (I)
368 the sending town adjustment factors for each sending town, and (II) the
369 product of the number of in-district students enrolled in such center and
370 five thousand two hundred, and (ii) five thousand two hundred
371 multiplied by the number of students enrolled in such center for the
372 current fiscal year, and (B) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(ii)
373 of this subdivision.
374 (3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, a local or regional board
375 of education that operates a regional agricultural science and
376 technology center shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the
377 sum of (A) seventy per cent of the difference between (i) the sum of (I)
378 the sending town adjustment factors for each sending town, and (II) the
379 product of the number of in-district students enrolled in such center and
380 five thousand two hundred, and (ii) five thousand two hundred
381 multiplied by the number of students enrolled in such center for the
382 current fiscal year, and (B) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(ii)
LCO 12 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
383 of this subdivision.
384 (4) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, a local or regional board
385 of education that operates a regional agricultural science and
386 technology center shall be entitled to a grant in an amount equal to the
387 sum of (A) eighty-five per cent of the difference between (i) the sum of
388 (I) the sending town adjustment factors for each sending town, and (II)
389 the product of the number of in-district students enrolled in such center
390 and five thousand two hundred, and (ii) five thousand two hundred
391 multiplied by the number of students enrolled in such center for the
392 current fiscal year, and (B) the amount described in subparagraph (A)(ii)
393 of this subdivision.
394 (5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
395 thereafter, a local or regional board of education that operates a regional
396 agricultural science and technology center shall be entitled to a grant in
397 an amount equal to the sum of (A) the sending town adjustment factors
398 for each sending town, and (B) the product of the number of in-district
399 students enrolled in such center and five thousand two hundred.
400 Sec. 3. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 10-65 of the general
401 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
402 (Effective July 1, 2026):
403 (2) The board of education operating an agricultural science and
404 technology education center may charge, subject to the provisions of
405 section 10-65b, tuition for a school year in an amount not to exceed fifty-
406 nine and two-tenths per cent of the foundation level pursuant to
407 subdivision (9) of section 10-262f, as amended by this act, per student
408 for the fiscal year in which the tuition is paid, except that (A) such board
409 may charge tuition for (i) students enrolled under shared-time
410 arrangements on a pro rata basis, and (ii) special education students
411 which shall not exceed the actual costs of educating such students minus
412 the amounts received pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
413 this section and subsection (c) of this section, and (B) (i) for the fiscal
414 [year] years ending June 30, 2025, and [each fiscal year thereafter] June
LCO 13 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
415 30, 2026, such board may charge such tuition in an amount not to exceed
416 fifty-eight per cent of the amount such board charged during the fiscal
417 year ending June 30, 2024, (ii) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
418 such board may charge such tuition in an amount not to exceed forty-
419 four per cent of the amount such board charged during the fiscal year
420 ending June 30, 2024, (iii) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, such
421 board may charge such tuition in an amount not to exceed thirty per
422 cent of the amount such board charged during the fiscal year ending
423 June 30, 2024, (iv) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, such board
424 may charge such tuition in an amount not to exceed fifteen per cent of
425 the amount such board charged during the fiscal year ending June 30,
426 2024, and (v) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
427 thereafter, such board shall not charge tuition. Any tuition paid by such
428 board for special education students in excess of the tuition paid for
429 non-special-education students shall be reimbursed pursuant to section
430 10-76g.
431 Sec. 4. Subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (k) of section 10-264l of
432 the 2026 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the
433 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
434 (k) (1) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2014, [and each fiscal
435 year thereafter] to June 30, 2029, inclusive, any tuition charged to a local
436 or regional board of education by [(A)] a regional educational service
437 center operating an interdistrict magnet school, [(B)] the Hartford school
438 district operating the Great Path Academy on behalf of Manchester
439 Community College, or [(C)] any interdistrict magnet school operator
440 described in section 10-264s, for any student enrolled in kindergarten to
441 grade twelve, inclusive, in such interdistrict magnet school shall be in
442 an amount equal to the difference between [(i)] (A) the average per pupil
443 expenditure of the magnet school for the prior fiscal year, and [(ii)] (B)
444 the amount of any per pupil state subsidy calculated under subsection
445 (c) of this section plus any revenue from other sources calculated on a
446 per pupil basis, except [for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and each
447 fiscal year thereafter,] the per student tuition charged to a local or
448 regional board of education shall not [(I)] (i) (I) for the fiscal years
LCO 14 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
449 ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, exceed fifty-eight per cent of the
450 per student tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024,
451 (II) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, exceed forty-four per cent of
452 the per student tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30,
453 2024, (III) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, exceed thirty per cent
454 of the per student tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30,
455 2024, and (IV) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, exceed fifteen per
456 cent of the per student tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June
457 30, 2024, or [(II)] (ii) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and each
458 fiscal year thereafter, for an interdistrict magnet school program that is
459 authorized to charge tuition to a local or regional board of education
460 under this subsection and commences operations on or after July 1, 2024,
461 exceed the per student average tuition charged by interdistrict magnet
462 school programs serving similar grade ranges in the same region as
463 determined by the commissioner. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
464 2030, and each fiscal year thereafter, a regional educational service
465 center operating an interdistrict magnet school, the Hartford school
466 district operating the Great Path Academy on behalf of Manchester
467 Community College, or any interdistrict magnet school operator
468 described in section 10-264s, shall not charge tuition to a local or regional
469 board of education, except for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2031, and
470 each fiscal year thereafter, such operator may charge tuition to a local or
471 regional board of education if the grant to which such operator is
472 entitled under section 10-252a, as amended by this act, is not calculated
473 using a foundation amount that is adjusted by the greater of either the
474 percentage increase in personal income, as defined in section 2-33a, or
475 the percentage increase in inflation, as defined in section 2-33a,
476 provided such tuition charged shall not exceed the difference between
477 the amount of the grant such operator would have been entitled to
478 receive for the fiscal year if such grant was calculated using the
479 foundation, as defined in section 10-252a, as amended by this act, and
480 the amount of the grant that such operator will receive for such fiscal
481 year. If any such board of education fails to pay such tuition, the
482 commissioner may withhold from such board's town or towns a sum
483 payable under section 10-262i in an amount not to exceed the amount of
LCO 15 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
484 the unpaid tuition to the magnet school and pay such money to the fiscal
485 agent for the magnet school as a supplementary grant for the operation
486 of the interdistrict magnet school program. In no case shall the sum of
487 such tuitions exceed the difference between the total expenditures of the
488 magnet school for the prior fiscal year and the total per pupil state
489 subsidy calculated under subsection (c) of this section plus any revenue
490 from other sources. The commissioner may conduct a comprehensive
491 financial review of the operating budget of a magnet school to verify
492 such tuition rate.
493 (2) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2016, [and each fiscal
494 year thereafter] to June 30, 2029, inclusive, a regional educational service
495 center operating an interdistrict magnet school offering a preschool
496 program that is not located in the Sheff region shall charge tuition to the
497 parent or guardian of a child enrolled in such preschool program in an
498 amount up to four thousand fifty-three dollars, except such regional
499 educational service center shall (A) not charge tuition to such parent or
500 guardian with a family income at or below seventy-five per cent of the
501 state median income, and (B) (i) (I) for the fiscal [year] years ending June
502 30, 2025, and [each fiscal year thereafter] June 30, 2026, charge tuition to
503 such parent or guardian in an amount not to exceed fifty-eight per cent
504 of the tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (II) for
505 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, charge tuition to such parent or
506 guardian in an amount not to exceed forty-four per cent of the tuition
507 charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (III) for the fiscal
508 year ending June 30, 2028, charge tuition to such parent or guardian in
509 an amount not to exceed thirty per cent of the tuition charged during
510 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, and (IV) for the fiscal year ending
511 June 30, 2029, charge tuition to such parent or guardian in an amount
512 not to exceed fifteen per cent of the tuition charged during the fiscal year
513 ending June 30, 2024, and (ii) except for an interdistrict magnet school
514 preschool program that is authorized to charge tuition to a parent or
515 guardian under this subsection and commences operations on or after
516 July 1, 2024, charge tuition to such parent or guardian in an amount not
517 to exceed the per child average tuition charged by interdistrict magnet
LCO 16 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
518 school preschool programs in the same region as determined by the
519 commissioner. The Department of Education shall, within available
520 appropriations, be financially responsible for any unpaid tuition
521 charged to such parent or guardian with a family income at or below
522 seventy-five per cent of the state median income. The commissioner
523 may conduct a comprehensive financial review of the operating budget
524 of any such magnet school charging such tuition to verify such tuition
525 rate. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
526 thereafter, a regional educational service center operating an
527 interdistrict magnet school offering a preschool program that is not
528 located in the Sheff region shall not charge tuition to the parent or
529 guardian of a child enrolled in such preschool program.
530 Sec. 5. Subdivision (2) of subsection (m) of section 10-264l of the 2026
531 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
532 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
533 (2) For the [school year commencing July 1, 2015, and each school
534 year thereafter] fiscal years ending June 30, 2016, to June 30, 2029,
535 inclusive, any interdistrict magnet school operator that is a local or
536 regional board of education and did not charge tuition to another local
537 or regional board of education for the school year commencing July 1,
538 2014, may not charge tuition to such board unless (A) such operator
539 receives authorization from the Commissioner of Education to charge
540 the proposed tuition, and (B) if such authorization is granted, such
541 operator provides written notification on or before September first of
542 the school year prior to the school year in which such tuition is to be
543 charged to such board of the tuition to be charged to such board for each
544 student that such board is otherwise responsible for educating and is
545 enrolled at the interdistrict magnet school under such operator's control,
546 except for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and each fiscal year
547 thereafter, the amount of such tuition charged to such other local or
548 regional board of education shall not (i) for the fiscal years ending June
549 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, exceed fifty-eight per cent of the per student
550 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, for the fiscal
551 year ending June 30, 2027, exceed forty-four per cent of the per student
LCO 17 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
552 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, for the fiscal
553 year ending June 30, 2028, exceed thirty per cent of the per student
554 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, and for the
555 fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, exceed fifteen per cent of the per student
556 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, or (ii) for an
557 interdistrict magnet school program that is authorized to charge tuition
558 to a local or regional board of education under this subsection and
559 commences operations on or after July 1, 2024, exceed the per student
560 average tuition charged by interdistrict magnet school programs
561 serving similar grade ranges in the same region as determined by the
562 commissioner. In deciding whether to authorize an interdistrict magnet
563 school operator to charge tuition under this subdivision, the
564 commissioner shall consider (I) the average per pupil expenditure of
565 such operator for each interdistrict magnet school under the control of
566 such operator, and (II) the amount of any per pupil state subsidy and
567 any revenue from other sources received by such operator. The
568 commissioner may conduct a comprehensive financial review of the
569 operating budget of the magnet school of such operator to verify that
570 the tuition is appropriate. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
571 apply to any interdistrict magnet school operator that is a regional
572 educational service center or assisting the state in meeting its obligations
573 pursuant to the decision in Sheff v. O'Neill, 238 Conn. 1 (1996), or any
574 related stipulation or order in effect, as determined by the
575 Commissioner of Education. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030,
576 and each fiscal year thereafter, any interdistrict magnet school operator
577 that is a local or regional board of education shall not charge tuition.
578 Sec. 6. Subsections (b) to (d), inclusive, of section 10-264o of the 2026
579 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
580 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
581 (b) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2013, [and each fiscal
582 year thereafter] to June 30, 2029, inclusive, any tuition charged to a local
583 or regional board of education by a regional educational service center
584 or by Goodwin University Magnet Schools operating an interdistrict
585 magnet school assisting the state in meeting its obligations pursuant to
LCO 18 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
586 the decision in Sheff v. O'Neill, 238 Conn. 1 (1996), or any related
587 stipulation or order in effect, as determined by the Commissioner of
588 Education, for any student enrolled in kindergarten to grade twelve,
589 inclusive, in such interdistrict magnet school shall be in an amount equal
590 to the difference between (1) the average per pupil expenditure of the
591 magnet school for the prior fiscal year, and (2) the amount of any per
592 pupil state subsidy calculated under subsection (c) of section 10-264l,
593 plus any revenue from other sources calculated on a per pupil basis,
594 except for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and each fiscal year
595 thereafter, the per student tuition charged to a local or regional board of
596 education shall not (A) (i) for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and
597 June 30, 2026, exceed fifty-eight per cent of the per student tuition
598 charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (ii) for the fiscal year
599 ending June 30, 2027, exceed forty-four per cent of the per student
600 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (iii) for the
601 fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, exceed thirty per cent of the per student
602 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, and (iv) for
603 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, exceed fifteen per cent of the per
604 student tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, or
605 (B) for an interdistrict magnet school program that is authorized to
606 charge tuition to a local or regional board of education under this
607 subsection and commences operations on or after July 1, 2024, exceed
608 the per student average tuition charged by interdistrict magnet school
609 programs serving similar grade ranges in the same region as determined
610 by the commissioner. If any such board of education fails to pay such
611 tuition, the commissioner may withhold from such board's town or
612 towns a sum payable under section 10-262i in an amount not to exceed
613 the amount of the unpaid tuition to the magnet school and pay such
614 money to the fiscal agent for the magnet school as a supplementary
615 grant for the operation of the interdistrict magnet school program. In no
616 case shall the sum of such tuitions exceed the difference between (i) the
617 total expenditures of the magnet school for the prior fiscal year, and (ii)
618 the total per pupil state subsidy calculated under subsection (c) of
619 section 10-264l, plus any revenue from other sources. The commissioner
620 may conduct a comprehensive review of the operating budget of a
LCO 19 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
621 magnet school to verify such tuition rate. For the fiscal year ending June
622 30, 2030, and each fiscal year thereafter, a regional educational service
623 center or Goodwin University Magnet Schools operating an interdistrict
624 magnet school shall not charge tuition under this subsection, except for
625 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2031, and each fiscal year thereafter, such
626 operator may charge tuition to a local or regional board of education if
627 the grant to which such operator is entitled to under section 10-252a, as
628 amended by this act, is not calculated using a foundation amount that is
629 adjusted by the greater of either the percentage increase in personal
630 income, as defined in section 2-33a, or the percentage increase in
631 inflation, as defined in section 2-33a, provided such tuition charged shall
632 not exceed the difference between the amount of the grant such operator
633 would have been entitled to receive for the fiscal year if such grant was
634 calculated using the foundation, as defined in section 10-252a, as
635 amended by this act, and the amount of the grant that such operator will
636 receive for such fiscal year.
637 (c) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2016, [and each fiscal
638 year thereafter] to June 30, 2029, inclusive, a regional educational service
639 center or Goodwin University Magnet Schools operating an interdistrict
640 magnet school assisting the state in meeting its obligations pursuant to
641 the decision in Sheff v. O'Neill, 238 Conn. 1 (1996), or any related
642 stipulation or order in effect, as determined by the Commissioner of
643 Education, and offering a preschool program shall charge tuition to the
644 parent or guardian of a child enrolled in such preschool program (1) for
645 the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, in an amount
646 not to exceed fifty-eight per cent of the per child tuition charged during
647 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (2) for the fiscal year ending June
648 30, 2027, in an amount not to exceed forty-four per cent of the per child
649 tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (3) for the
650 fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, in an amount not to exceed thirty per
651 cent of the per child tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June
652 30, 2024, and (4) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, in an amount
653 not to exceed fifteen per cent of the per child tuition charged during the
654 fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, except such regional educational service
LCO 20 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
655 center or Goodwin University Magnet Schools shall [(1)] (A) not charge
656 tuition to such parent or guardian with a family income at or below
657 seventy-five per cent of the state median income, and [(2)] (B) for an
658 interdistrict magnet school preschool program that is authorized to
659 charge tuition to a parent or guardian under this subsection and
660 commences operations on or after July 1, 2024, charge tuition to such
661 parent or guardian in an amount not to exceed the per child average
662 tuition charged by interdistrict magnet school preschool programs in
663 the same region as determined by the commissioner. The Department
664 of Education shall, within available appropriations, be financially
665 responsible for any unpaid tuition charged to such parent or guardian
666 with a family income at or below seventy-five per cent of the state
667 median income. The commissioner may conduct a comprehensive
668 financial review of the operating budget of any such magnet school
669 charging such tuition to verify such tuition rate. For the fiscal year
670 ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year thereafter, a regional
671 educational service center and Goodwin University Magnet Schools
672 operating an interdistrict magnet school and offering a preschool
673 program shall not charge tuition under this subsection.
674 (d) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2025, [and each fiscal
675 year thereafter] to June 30, 2029, inclusive, any interdistrict magnet
676 school operator described in section 10-264s that offers a preschool
677 program shall charge tuition to the parent or guardian of a child
678 enrolled in such preschool program (1) for the fiscal years ending June
679 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, in an amount not to exceed fifty-eight per
680 cent of the per child tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June
681 30, 2024, (2) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in an amount not to
682 exceed forty-four per cent of the per child tuition charged during the
683 fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (3) for the fiscal year ending June 30,
684 2028, in an amount not to exceed thirty per cent of the per child tuition
685 charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, and (4) for the fiscal
686 year ending June 30, 2029, in an amount not to exceed fifteen per cent of
687 the per child tuition charged during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024,
688 except [(1)] (A) such interdistrict magnet school operator shall not
LCO 21 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
689 charge tuition to such parent or guardian with a family income at or
690 below seventy-five per cent of the state median income, and [(2)] (B) for
691 an interdistrict magnet school preschool program that is authorized to
692 charge tuition to a parent or guardian under this subsection and
693 commences operations on or after July 1, 2024, shall not charge tuition
694 to such parent or guardian in an amount not to exceed the per child
695 average tuition charged by interdistrict magnet school preschool
696 programs in the same region as determined by the commissioner. The
697 Department of Education shall, within available appropriations, be
698 financially responsible for any unpaid tuition charged to such parent or
699 guardian with a family income at or below seventy-five per cent of the
700 state median income. The commissioner may conduct a comprehensive
701 financial review of the operating budget of any such interdistrict magnet
702 school operator charging such tuition to verify such tuition rate. For the
703 fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year thereafter, any
704 interdistrict magnet school operator described in section 10-264s that
705 offers a preschool program shall not charge tuition to the parent or
706 guardian of a child enrolled in such preschool program.
707 Sec. 7. Subsection (d) of section 10-66ee of the general statutes is
708 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
709 2026):
710 (d) (1) As used in this subsection:
711 (A) "Total charter need students" means the sum of (i) the number of
712 students enrolled in state charter schools under the control of the
713 governing authority for such state charter schools for the school year,
714 and (ii) for the school year commencing July 1, 2021, and each school
715 year thereafter, (I) thirty per cent of the number of children enrolled in
716 such state charter schools eligible for free or reduced price meals or free
717 milk, (II) fifteen per cent of the number of such children eligible for free
718 or reduced price meals or free milk in excess of the number of such
719 children eligible for free or reduced price meals or free milk that is equal
720 to sixty per cent of the total number of children enrolled in such state
721 charter schools, and (III) twenty-five per cent of the number of students
LCO 22 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
722 enrolled in such state charter schools who are multilingual learners, as
723 defined in section 10-76kk.
724 (B) "Foundation" has the same meaning as provided in section 10-
725 262f, as amended by this act.
726 (C) "Charter full weighted funding per student" means the quotient
727 of (i) the product of the total charter need students and the foundation,
728 and (ii) the number of students enrolled in state charter schools under
729 the control of the governing authority for such state charter schools for
730 the school year.
731 (D) "Charter grant adjustment" means the absolute value of the
732 difference between the foundation and charter full weighted funding
733 per student for state charter schools under the control of the governing
734 authority for such state charter schools for the school year.
735 [(2) For the fiscal year ending July 1, 2022, the state shall pay in
736 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
737 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus four
738 and one-tenth per cent of its charter grant adjustment.
739 (3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the state shall pay in
740 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
741 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus
742 twenty-five and forty-two-one-hundredths per cent of its charter grant
743 adjustment.
744 (4) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, the state shall pay in
745 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
746 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus
747 thirty-six and eight-one-hundredths per cent of its charter grant
748 adjustment.]
749 (E) "Fully funded grant" means the product of (i) the foundation, and
750 (ii) the total charter need students.
751 [(5)] (2) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2025, [and each
LCO 23 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
752 fiscal year thereafter] and June 30, 2026, inclusive, the state shall pay in
753 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
754 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus
755 fifty-six and seven tenths per cent of its charter grant adjustment.
756 (3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the state shall pay in
757 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
758 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus
759 sixty-seven per cent of its charter grant adjustment.
760 (4) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, the state shall pay in
761 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
762 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus
763 seventy-eight per cent of its charter grant adjustment.
764 (5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, the state shall pay in
765 accordance with this subsection, to the fiscal authority for a state charter
766 school for each student enrolled in such school, the foundation plus
767 eighty-nine per cent of its charter grant adjustment.
768 (6) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, and each fiscal year
769 thereafter, the state shall pay in accordance with this subsection, to the
770 fiscal authority for a state charter school its fully funded grant.
771 [(6)] (7) Payments under subdivisions (2) to [(5)] (6), inclusive, of this
772 subsection shall be paid as follows: Twenty-five per cent of the amount
773 not later than July fifteenth and September first based on estimated
774 student enrollment on May first, and twenty-five per cent of the amount
775 not later than January first and the remaining amount not later than
776 April first, each based on student enrollment on October first.
777 [(7)] (8) In the case of a student identified as requiring special
778 education, the school district in which the student resides shall: (A)
779 Hold the planning and placement team meeting for such student and
780 shall invite representatives from the charter school to participate in such
781 meeting; and (B) pay the state charter school, on a quarterly basis, an
782 amount equal to the difference between the reasonable cost of educating
LCO 24 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
783 such student and the sum of the amount received by the state charter
784 school for such student pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
785 and amounts received from other state, federal, local or private sources
786 calculated on a per pupil basis. Such school district shall be eligible for
787 reimbursement pursuant to section 10-76g. The charter school a student
788 requiring special education attends shall be responsible for ensuring
789 that such student receives the services mandated by the student's
790 individualized education program whether such services are provided
791 by the charter school or by the school district in which the student
792 resides.
793 Sec. 8. Section 10-76ddd of the 2026 supplement to the general
794 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
795 (Effective July 1, 2026):
796 For purposes of determining the reasonable costs associated with the
797 provision of special education and related services pursuant to
798 subdivision [(7)] (8) of subsection (d) of section 10-66ee, as amended by
799 this act, subsection (d) of section 10-76d, section 10-76g, subsection (a)
800 of section 10-76i, subsection (b) of section 10-253, subsection (h) of
801 section 10-264l and subsection (i) of section 10-266aa, (1) on and after
802 July 1, 2026, "reasonable costs" means the amount allowed to be charged
803 to a local or regional board of education by a charging entity, as defined
804 in section 10-76a, under the individualized special education and related
805 services rate schedule established pursuant to section 10-76aaa, as
806 amended by this act, for the provision of special education and related
807 services pursuant to a student's individualized education program, and
808 (2) on and after July 1, 2025, there shall be no presumption that
809 "reasonable costs" means the actual cost incurred for the provision of
810 special education and related services pursuant to a student's
811 individualized education program.
812 Sec. 9. Subsection (f) of section 10-76aaa of the 2026 supplement to the
813 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
814 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
LCO 25 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
815 (f) The Commissioner of Education shall consult with (1) ConnCase,
816 (2) the Connecticut Association of Private Special Education Facilities,
817 (3) the Children's League of Connecticut, and (4) any other approved
818 nonprofit private providers of special education services and approved
819 for-profit private providers of special education services as the
820 commissioner deems necessary, for the purpose of developing proposed
821 rates for special education services, excluding transportation services,
822 for all approved private providers of special education services. Not
823 later than December 31, 2027, the commissioner shall develop proposed
824 individual rates for each special education service, excluding
825 transportation services, for all approved private providers of special
826 education services, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b)
827 of this section, except for the period commencing July 1, 2025, until
828 December 31, 2027, the commissioner may develop such individual
829 rates for each special education service, in accordance with the
830 provisions of subsection (b) of this section. Following the development
831 of any such proposed rates, the commissioner shall submit all such
832 proposed rates not later than January first following such development
833 to the General Assembly for approval or disapproval. If the General
834 Assembly fails to approve or disapprove such proposed rates on or
835 before the March fifteenth after such submission, such proposed rates
836 shall be deemed approved. Any such proposed rate that is approved by
837 the General Assembly or deemed approved shall become effective on
838 the July first following such approval.
839 Sec. 10. Subdivision (1) of subsection (e) of section 10-76ggg of the
840 2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
841 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
842 (e) (1) All aid distributed to a board of education pursuant to the
843 provisions of this section shall be expended for special education
844 purposes only. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each fiscal
845 year thereafter, if a board receives an increase in funds pursuant to this
846 section over the amount it received for the prior fiscal year, such
847 increase shall not be used to supplant funding for special education
848 purposes. The budgeted appropriation for special education for any
LCO 26 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
849 board receiving an increase in funds pursuant to this section shall be not
850 less than the amount appropriated for special education for the prior
851 year plus such increase in funds. For purposes of this subsection,
852 "special education purposes" means the direct provision of special
853 education and related services to students, Tier 2 interventions,
854 academic and behavioral interventions, the hiring and salaries of special
855 education teachers, paraeducators and behavioral and reading
856 specialists who work directly with students, equipment purchases and
857 maintenance and curriculum materials. "Special education purposes"
858 does not include any [(A)] administrative functions or operating
859 expenses related to the provision of special education and related
860 services. [, or (B) special education and related services provided by any
861 third-party contractor.]
862 Sec. 11. Subsection (a) of section 10-550b of the 2026 supplement to
863 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
864 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
865 (a) As part of Early Start CT, the state, acting by and in the discretion
866 of the Commissioner of Early Childhood, may enter into direct or third-
867 party contracts to provide financial assistance to municipalities, local
868 and regional boards of education, regional educational service centers,
869 family resource centers, Head Start programs, preschool programs,
870 nonprofit organizations, child care centers, group child care homes,
871 family child care homes, as such terms are described in section 19a-77,
872 and any other programs that meet standards established by the
873 commissioner for the purpose of operating early care and education
874 programs that focus on providing early childhood services based on
875 economic, social or environmental conditions, including in regions with
876 insufficient access to child care. [At least sixty per cent of the eligible
877 children enrolled in an] Any early care and education program receiving
878 financial assistance under Early Start CT shall [be] (1) ensure that at least
879 sixty per cent of the children enrolled in such early care and education
880 program are members of a family that is at or below seventy-five per
881 cent of the state median income, and (2) give priority for child care
882 spaces in such early care and education program to those families who
LCO 27 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
883 were previously receiving a child care subsidy under the child care
884 subsidy program, established pursuant to section 17b-749, but who no
885 longer meet the income eligibility standards established by the
886 commissioner for the child care subsidy program pursuant to subsection
887 (b) of section 17b-749. No such financial assistance shall be available to
888 [(1)] (A) any such child care center, group child care home or family
889 child care home unless such center or home has been licensed by the
890 Commissioner of Early Childhood pursuant to section 19a-80 or 19a-
891 87b, or [(2)] (B) any such local or regional board of education or regional
892 educational service center unless the preschool program is approved by
893 the Department of Education. The commissioner shall ensure that the
894 majority of such early care and education programs receiving such
895 financial assistance shall serve children that reside in or attend early care
896 and education programs located in priority school districts pursuant to
897 section 10-266p, former priority school districts or towns with schools
898 deemed severe need schools because forty per cent or more of the
899 lunches served are served to students who are eligible for free or
900 reduced price lunches pursuant to federal law. In determining whether
901 to enter into a contract for financial assistance under this section, the
902 commissioner may consider [(A)] (i) a community's participation in the
903 state's subsidized child care subsidy program established pursuant to
904 section 17b-749, and [(B)] (ii) the Centers for Disease Control and
905 Prevention's social vulnerability index determined by census tract.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-262f(9)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-252a
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-65(b)(2)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 10-264l(k)(1) and (2)
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 10-264l(m)(2)
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 10-264o(b) to (d)
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 10-66ee(d)
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026 10-76ddd
Sec. 9 July 1, 2026 10-76aaa(f)
Sec. 10 July 1, 2026 10-76ggg(e)(1)
LCO 28 of 29

Substitute Bill No. 5002
Sec. 11 July 1, 2026 10-550b(a)
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 29 of 29